Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1328
Act, how construed.

Sections 69-1301 to 69-1329 shall be so construed as to effectuate their general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact them.

Laws 1969, c. 611, § 28, p. 2490.